Hawaii statutes.
§325-2 Physicians, laboratory directors,
and health care professionals to report. Every physician or health care
professional having a client affected by or suspected of being affected by a
disease or condition declared to be communicable or dangerous to the public
health by the director of health shall report the incidence or suspected
incidence of such disease or condition to the department of health in writing
or in the manner specified by the department of health. Every laboratory
director having laboratory data regarding an individual affected by or
suspected of being affected by a disease or condition declared to be
communicable or dangerous to the public health shall report such diseases or
conditions to the department of health in writing or in a manner specified by
the health department; provided that the laboratory data reported to the
department of health shall include the individual's complete demographic
information, including name, date of birth, residential address, and phone
number, obtained and confirmed at the time of specimen collection for the
purposes of facilitating a public health investigation as necessary by the
department of health. Every physician, laboratory director, or health care
professional who violates this section may be fined in an amount not to exceed
$1,000 per violation, to be assessed by the director of health. The director
of health is authorized to impose the penalty pursuant to this section. [PC
1869, c 59, §24; am L 1911, c 125, §1; am L 1919, c 22, §1; RL 1925, §932, pt
of §1022; RL 1935, §1090; am L 1943, c 43, §5(b); RL 1945, §2301; am L 1949, c
53, §29; RL 1955, §49-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §325-2; gen ch 1985; am
L 1987, c 265, §2; am L 1988, c 158, §1; am L 2016, c 115, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next